Maryland, session 2025, SB0289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article XI – City of Baltimore
7.
From and after the adoption of this Constitution, no debt except as hereinafter
provided in this section, shall be created by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore; nor
shall the credit of the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore be given, or loaned to, or in aid
of any individual, association, or corporation; nor shall the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore have the power to involve the City of Baltimore in the construction of works of
internal improvement, nor in granting any aid thereto, which shall involve the faith and
credit of the City, nor make any appropriation therefor, unless the debt or credit is
authorized by an ordinance of the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore[, submitted to the
legal voters of the City of Baltimore, at such time and place as may be fixed by the
ordinance, and approved by a majority of the votes cast at that time and place]. An
ordinance for the authorization of debt or credit as aforesaid [may not be submitted to the
legal voters of Baltimore City unless the proposed creation of debt or extension of credit is]
SHALL BE either (1) presented to and approved by a majority of the members of the General
Assembly representing Baltimore City [no later than the 30th day of the regular session of
the General Assembly immediately preceding its submission to the voters], or (2)
authorized by an act of the General Assembly. The ordinance shall provide for the discharge
of any such debt or credit within the period of 40 years from the time of contracting the
same. The Mayor and City Council may, temporarily, borrow any amount of money to meet
any deficiency in the City treasury, and may borrow any amount at any time to provide for
any emergency arising from the necessity of maintaining the police, or preserving the
health, safety and sanitary condition of the City, and may make due and proper
arrangements and agreements for the renewal and extension, in whole or in part, of any
and all debts and obligations created according to law before the adoption of this
Constitution.
The General Assembly may, from time to time, fix a limit upon the aggregate amount
of bonds and other evidences of indebtedness of the City outstanding at any one time to the
same extent as it fixes such a limit upon the indebtedness of the chartered counties.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
The Charter of Baltimore City
Article II – General Powers
The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore shall have full power and authority to
exercise all of the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to it by the Constitution of

SENATE BILL 289 3
Maryland or by any Public General or Public Local Laws of the State of Maryland; and in
particular, without limitation upon the foregoing, shall have power by ordinance, or such
other method as may be provided for in its Charter, subject to the provisions of said
Constitution and Public General Laws:
(62)
(a) (1) To borrow money by issuing and selling bonds, at any time and from
time to time, for the purpose of financing and refinancing the development of an industrial,
commercial, or residential area in Baltimore City. Such bonds shall be payable from and
secured by a pledge of the special fund described in subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this section and
the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore may also establish sinking funds, establish debt
service reserve funds, or pledge other assets and revenues towards the payments of the
principal and interest, including revenues received by the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore pursuant to a development agreement.
(f) (2) The ordinance, if such bonds constitute debt of the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore [under], SHALL COMPLY WITH Section 7 of Article XI of the State
Constitution[, shall be submitted to the legal voters of the City of Baltimore at the time
and place specified therein. Such ordinance shall become effective only if it is approved by
the majority of the votes cast at the time and place specified in such ordinance]. Except as
otherwise provided herein, this section may not be construed as requiring the submission
to the legal voters of the City of Baltimore of any ordinance creating a development district
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(62A)
(g) (3) (i) Before the ordinance that designates a special taxing district,
authorizes the issuance of bonds, or levies ad valorem taxes or special taxes under the
provisions of this section may be finally enacted, the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore
shall hold a public hearing after giving not less than 10–days notice in a newspaper of
general circulation in the City of Baltimore.
(ii) The ordinance enacted pursuant to this subsection, if such bonds
constitute debt of the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore [under], SHALL COMPLY WITH
Article XI, § 7 of the Maryland Constitution[, shall be submitted to the legal voters of the
City of Baltimore at the time and place specified therein. Such ordinance shall become
effective only if it is approved by the majority of the votes cast at the time and place
specified in such ordinance].
Article 4 – Baltimore City
25–7.
Immediately upon the approval of the loan of $5,000,000, hereinafter mentioned, [by
the legal voters of Baltimore City, but not otherwise] IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 7

SENATE BILL 289
OF ARTICLE XI OF THE CONSTITUTION OF MARYLAND, the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore shall pay to the treasurer of Baltimore County, out of the proceeds of said loan,
the sum of thirty–five thousand dollars, in lieu, and release of, and, as full compensation
for, all county taxes due, or to become due, on any and all land, property, or things, acquired
or held, or thereafter to be acquired or held, by said Mayor and City Council of Baltimore,
under the loan hereinafter provided for and under the provisions of this subheading, or in
connection with the work herein contemplated, and thereafter such land, property, or
things, when so held or acquired by said city, shall be exempt from taxation for county
purposes; all laws, or parts of laws, inconsistent herewith being hereby repealed to the
extent of such inconsistency. The object of this section is to indemnify Baltimore County
against all loss in taxes, immediate or prospective, that may be entailed upon it by the
appropriation for public use, by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore, of any and all
such land, property or things.
25–16.
In order to provide money to defray the cost of carrying all or any of the purposes of
the provisions of this subheading into execution, the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore
is hereby authorized to issue the stock of said corporation for a sum not exceeding Five
Millions of Dollars; said stock to be issued from time to time as the Mayor and City Council
of Baltimore shall by ordinance prescribe, and to be issued for such amounts, and to be
payable at such time and to bear such rate of interest as the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore shall by ordinance provide; said stock shall be sold and issued by the
Commissioners of Finance of the City of Baltimore at the best prices obtainable in their
judgment therefor, and any premiums derived from the sale thereof shall remain in their
hands as part of the sinking fund hereinafter mentioned for the redemption of said stock at
maturity.
The residue of the money received from the sale of said stock shall be turned over by
them to the Comptroller to be by him deposited with the City Register, and to be placed to
the credit of a fund to be known as the “Gunpowder Reservoir Fund,” which shall be
exclusively applicable to the cost of carrying the purposes and provisions of this subheading
into execution, and shall be chargeable with no other items of cost or expense whatsoever,
and appropriation to defray said cost, based upon the estimate of the person charged with
the duty of doing the work contemplated by this subheading shall be annually included by
the Board of Estimates in the usual way in the Ordinance of Estimates, but said stock shall
not be issued in whole or in part unless the ordinance of the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore providing for the issuance [thereof, shall be submitted to the legal voters of the
City of Baltimore at such time and place as may be fixed by said ordinance and approved
by a majority of votes cast at such time and place as required by] COMPLIES WITH Section
7 of Article XI of the Constitution of Maryland; if issued [pursuant to such approval], the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore shall levy in each and every year upon all property
liable to taxation in the City of Baltimore, a sum sufficient to pay the interest accruing on
said stock, and to create a sinking fund sufficient, with the aid of any premiums on the sale
thereof to redeem said stock at its maturity.

SENATE BILL 289 5
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects only the City of Baltimore and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the
Maryland Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the next general election to be
held in November 2026 for adoption or rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution.
(b) (1) At that general election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the
Constitution shall be by ballot, and on each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the
Constitutional Amendment” and “Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now
provided by law.
(2) At that general election, a question substantially similar to the
following shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State:
“Question ____ – Constitutional Amendment
The proposed amendment removes the requirement that debt or credit created by the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore be approved by the legal voters of the City of
Baltimore through a majority of the votes cast at the appropriate election.”.
(c) Immediately after the election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of
the vote for and against the proposed amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution, and further proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 5 of this Act, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the
Governor that the constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast
at the general election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.